Utah statutes.
58-41-15.   Violation of chapter -- Penalties.

A person who violates any provision of this chapter is, upon conviction, guilty of a class A misdemeanor.  Whenever any person other than a licensed speech-language pathologist or audiologist has engaged in any practice that constitutes an offense under this chapter, a court of appropriate jurisdiction may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining that conduct.



Amended by Chapter 207, 1989 General Session

